src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-oahpa.lexc
LEXICON PRED_0 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis


LEXICON PRED_S !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>s FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis

LEXICON PRED_H !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis


LEXICON PRED_N !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>n FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis

LEXICON PRED_AN !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>an FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis




!! !!!Odd syllabic stems - adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ODDCASE !!= * __@CODE@__
   ODDCASENOM ;
   ODDCASEOBL ;

LEXICON ODDCASENOM !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:e%>%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ODDCASEOBL !!= ** __@CODE@__
   +A+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
   +A+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
   +A+Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +A+Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
   +A+Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1    ;
   +A+Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1    ;
       +A+Pl:             N_ODD_PL  ;
          +A:             N_ODD_ESS ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn R         ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi  R         ;

LEXICON ije_ODDCASE !!= * __@CODE@__
   ije_ODDCASENOM ;
   ije_ODDCASEOBL ;

LEXICON ije_ODDCASENOM !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:e%>%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ije_ODDCASEOBL !!= ** __@CODE@__
         +A+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1    ;
         +A+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1    ;
         +A+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
         +A+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1    ;
         +A+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1    ;
         +A+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Nom:%>h               FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Gen:%>i               FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1    ;
         +A+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1    ;
 +A+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1    ; !

                +A:                  N_ODD_ESS ;
       +A+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn      R         ;
       +A+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi       R         ;



!! !!!Even syllabic stems - adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON eCASE !!= * __@CODE@__
   eCASENOM ;
   eCASEOBL ;

LEXICON eCASENOM !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg: NIEJTESGNOM ;

LEXICON eCASEOBL !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A: NIEJTEOBL ;



LEXICON aCASE !!= * __@CODE@__
   aCASENOM ;
   aCASEOBL ;


LEXICON aCASENOM !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg: MAANASGNOM ;

LEXICON aCASEOBL !!= ** __@CODE@__
                             +A:          MAANA_PL ;
                             +A:          EVEN_ESS ;
                    +A+SgNomCmp:a         R        ;
                    +A+SgGenCmp:a%>n      R        ;
                    +A+PlGenCmp:a%>j      R        ;
! +A+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>edh     FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>se     FINAL1   ;
                      +A+Sg+Acc:a%>m      FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1   ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>emem    FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>emdh    FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>mse    FINAL1   ;
                      +A+Sg+Gen:a%>n      FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>ene     FINAL1   ;
                      +A+Sg+Ill:e%>se     FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>asanne  FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>asadth  FINAL1   ;
                      +A+Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1   ;
                      +A+Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>astanne FINAL1   ;
         +A+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>astadth FINAL1   ;
                      +A+Sg+Com:%>ine     FINAL1   ;
        +A+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>anadth  FINAL1   ;

LEXICON ieCASE !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg: N_IE_SG_NOM ;
        ieCASEOBL   ;

LEXICON ieCASEOBL !!= ** __@CODE@__
             +A+Sg:          N_IE_SG_OBLadj ;
             +A+Pl:          N_IE_PL        ;
                +A:          N_IE_ESS       ;
       +A+SgNomCmp:ie        R              ;
       +A+SgGenCmp:ie%>n     R              ;
 +A+PlGenCmp+NoUml:ie%>j     R              ;
   +A+PlGenCmp+Uml:%>%^iUMLi R              ;


LEXICON oeCASE !!= * __@CODE@__
   oeCASE_NOMSG ;
   oeCASE_OBL   ;

LEXICON oeCASE_NOMSG !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1 ;

LEXICON oeCASE_OBL !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Sg: A_OE_SGILL_UML ; ! Causes Umlaut
        A_OE           ;

LEXICON A_OE_SGILL_UML !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Ill+Uml:e%>%^2UMLse FINAL1 ; ! Causes Umlaut

LEXICON A_OE !!= ** __@CODE@__
       +A+Sg:      A_OE_SG  ;
       +A+Pl:      A_OE_PL  ;
          +A:      A_OE_ESS ;
 +A+SgNomCmp:oe    R        ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:oe%>n R        ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:oe%>j R        ;

LEXICON A_OE_SG !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Acc:oe%>m  FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:oe%>n  FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:o%>se  FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:o%>sne FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:o%>ste FINAL1 ;
 +Com:o%>jne FINAL1 ;

LEXICON A_OE_PL !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Nom:oe%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Acc:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:oe%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:o%>jste     FINAL1 ;
 +Com:oe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON A_OE_ESS !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Ess:o%>jne FINAL1 ;







!! !!!Comparative forms
! -----------------

LEXICON EVENCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__
   EVENCOMPONLY ;
   EVENSUPONLY  ;

LEXICON EVENCOMPONLY !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +A+Comp+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP ATTRCONT     ;
                                       EVENCOMPCASE ;
                                       DIMCOMP      ;
      +A+Comp:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP LAAKAN       ;


LEXICON EVENSUPONLY !!= ** __@CODE@__
   +A+Superl+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
                                            MES      ;
        +A+Superl:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP LAAKAN   ;

LEXICON EVENCOMP_oe !!= * __@CODE@__
          +A+Comp+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP   ATTRCONT        ;
   +A+Comp+Attr+Use/NG:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%^DISIMP  ATTRCONT        ;
                                                  EVENCOMPCASE_oe ;
        +A+Superl+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP  ATTRCONT        ;
 +A+Superl+Attr+Use/NG:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT        ;
                                                  MES_oe          ;
                                                  DIMCOMP         ;
               +A+Comp:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP   LAAKAN          ;

LEXICON ODDCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__
                               +A+Comp+Attr:%>åbpoe     ATTRCONT    ; ! båajoesåbpoe, *båajasåbpoe
                       +A+Comp+Attr+Err/Orth:%>abpa      ATTRCONT    ; ! båajasabpa,   *båajoesabpa
                            +A+Comp+Err/Orth:%>abp       ABPA        ;
                                    +A+Comp:%>åbp       ÅBPOE       ;
                             +A+Superl+Attr:%>ommes     ATTRCONT    ;
                                           :%>ommes     OMMES       ;
                +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Attr:%>obpe%»tje ATTRCONT    ;
                     +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:%>obpe%»tj  GÅATETJEadj ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Attr+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>abpe%»tje ATTRCONT    ;
      +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>abpa%»tj  GÅATETJEadj ;
                                    +A+Comp:%>åbpoe     LAAKAN      ;
